Illinois, session 104th, HB4586.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $7,500,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for the purpose of 7making a grant to the Illinois Network of Centers for 8Independent Living to administer and implement the Home 9Modification Program. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.